Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES WORK EXCEPTION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 268.085, or any other law to the contrary, for an applicant who was laid off from an employer in the iron ore mining industry on or after April 1, 2025, and before July 2, 2025: new text end new text begin (1) working temporarily in the labor market area emergency medical services sector is considered good cause for failing to apply for, accept, or avoid suitable employment; and new text end new text begin (2) no deduction shall be made from the applicant's weekly unemployment benefit amount for earnings from temporary employment in the labor market area emergency medical services sector. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from April 1, 2025. new text end